District of Columbia statutes.
22-4003

Certification duties of the Superior Court.

(a)

Upon a finding that a defendant committed a registration offense, the Court shall enter an order certifying that the defendant is a sex offender and that the defendant will be subject to registration for the period set forth in § 22-4002(a) or (b). The Court shall advise the sex offender of that person’s duties under this chapter, shall order the sex offender to report to the Agency to register as required by the Agency and to comply with the requirements of this chapter, and shall require the sex offender to read and sign the order.

(b)

The Court shall provide to the Agency a copy of the certification and order and such other records and information as will assist in the registration of the sex offender.

(c)

In any case where the Court orders the release of a sex offender into the community following a period of detention, incarceration, confinement, civil commitment, or hospitalization, the Court shall:

(1)

If the sex offender has been certified as a sex offender under subsection (a) of this section, provide the sex offender with a copy of the order required under subsection (a) of this section and require the sex offender to read and sign the copy of the order; or

(2)

If the sex offender has not been certified as a sex offender under subsection (a) of this section, follow the procedures set forth under subsection (a) of this section.

(d)

The applicability of the requirements of this chapter to a person otherwise subject to this chapter does not depend on the Court’s making a certification under subsection (a) of this section. The Court is required to enter an order certifying that a person is a sex offender only when —

(1)

A defendant is found in a proceeding before the Court to have committed a registration offense;

(2)

The Court, on or after July 11, 2000, orders the release of a sex offender into the community following a period of detention, incarceration, confinement, civil commitment, or hospitalization;

(3)

The government makes a motion for such a certification and the Court grants the motion; or

(4)

A motion is filed as authorized under § 22-4004 and the Court denies the motion.

History

July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 4, 47 DCR 797

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-4004 and § 22-4013.